Nebraska, session 109, LB500.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB500 LB500
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) The School Financing Review Commission is created.
The commission consists of twenty-one members, including:
(a) The Commissioner of Education or a designee of the Commissioner
of Education;
(b) One representative of the Governor appointed by the Governor;
(c) Three members of the Legislature, who shall be nonvoting members
of the commission, one from each congressional district with no more than
two from the same political party and with one being a member of the
Education Committee of the Legislature and one being a member of the
Revenue Committee of the Legislature;
(d) The Property Tax Administrator or a designee of the Property Tax
Administrator;
(e) One representative of postsecondary education with expertise in
school finance;
(f) One member of the Educational Service Unit Coordinating Council;
(g) One school board member and one school administrator each
representing a Class III school district with not more than one thousand
two hundred students;
(h) One school board member and one school administrator each
representing a Class III school district with more than one thousand two
hundred students but not more than ten thousand students;
(i) One representative of a Class IV school district and one
representative of a Class V school district. One member appointed
pursuant to this subdivision shall be a school board member of the school
district being represented, and the other member appointed pursuant to
this subdivision shall be a school administrator in the other school
district being represented;
(j) One member who is teaching as a certificated teacher in a public
school; and
(k) Six members from the state at large, two from each congressional
district, who reside in school districts of varied sizes and with varying
-2-

LB500 LB500
2025 2025
percentages of limited English proficiency students and poverty students.
At least one of the members appointed pursuant to this subdivision shall
have experience in business and at least one shall have experience in
farming.
(2) The members described in subdivision (1)(c) shall be appointed
by the Executive Board of the Legislative Council in January of each odd-
numbered year for two-year terms, except the initial members shall be
appointed within thirty days after the effective date of this act and
shall serve until their successors are appointed in January of 2027.
(3) The members described in subdivisions (1)(e) through (k) of this
section shall be appointed by the Governor within thirty days after the
effective date of this act to serve through December 31, 2034, and any
vacancy shall be filled by the Governor for the remainder of the vacated
term. Of the four members described in subdivisions (1)(g) and (h) of
this section, at least one shall be from each congressional district. To
the extent possible, the membership of the commission shall be diverse in
terms of race, gender, and other demographic factors.
(4) Members of the commission shall not receive any compensation for
their services but shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred as a member
of the commission as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.
(5) The Commissioner of Education or the designee of the
Commissioner of Education shall be the chairperson of the commission, and
the commission shall elect a vice-chairperson from among its members.
(6) The staff of the State Department of Education may assist as
needed and requested by the chairperson of the commission in accordance
with guidelines developed by the commission. The commission may also
obtain assistance from the State Department of Education and the
Department of Revenue in acquiring the data needed to carry out its
duties.
(7) For administrative purposes, the commission shall be housed
within the State Department of Education.
-3-

LB500 LB500
2025 2025
Sec. 2. (1) The School Financing Review Commission shall conduct an
indepth review of the financing of the public elementary and secondary
schools. As a part of such indepth review, the commission shall:
(a) Examine methods of financing public elementary and secondary
schools, including methods used in other states, which would provide
equitable educational opportunities across the state and offer
alternatives to a heavy reliance on property tax;
(b) Examine the option of using a measure of income as a component
in the financing of public elementary and secondary schools;
(c) Examine the option of using sales tax as a component in the
financing of public elementary and secondary schools, including, but not
limited to, an examination of the experience of any other states with
such option;
(d) Examine financing issues as they relate to the quality and
performance of public elementary and secondary schools;
(e) Examine options for funding public prekindergarten services;
(f) Examine options for funding college-readiness and career-
readiness programs, including, but not limited to, programs of
excellence, dual-enrollment courses, and career academies;
(g) Examine the costs and resources necessary to meet the diverse
and growing needs of students across the state, including, but not
limited to, the needs of poverty students and limited English proficiency
students;
(h) Examine methods used by other states to fund public elementary
and secondary school infrastructure needs;
(i) Examine other issues related to public elementary and secondary
school finance as necessary and as determined by the chairperson; and
(j) Prepare a preliminary report and present it to the Legislative
Council in November 2025. A final report with recommendations on
maintaining adequate and equitable funding for public schools in light of
information gathered through the review shall be presented to the
-4-

LB500 LB500
2025 2025
Governor, to the State Board of Education, and electronically to the
Legislature by December 1, 2025.
(2) After submission of its final report described in subsection (1)
of this section, to assure that every Nebraskan is educated for success,
the School Financing Review Commission shall:
(a) Review the mission of providing Nebraskans the opportunity to
acquire the necessary skills and knowledge to be productive individuals;
(b) Review, make recommendations on, and report on progress toward
achieving any goals established by the Legislature and the State
Department of Education related to such mission. The commission may
solicit comments, concerns, and case studies from schools of all sizes in
Nebraska and develop best practices for implementing and achieving such
goals; and
(c) Review the implementation of the Tax Equity and Educational
Opportunities Support Act and the implementation of any recommendations
contained in the reports issued under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) On or before July 1 of each even-numbered year beginning in 2028
and ending in 2034, the School Financing Review Commission shall report
to the Governor, to the State Board of Education, and electronically to
the Legislature on the adequacy of school funding sources.
Sec. 3. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-5-